Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General

§ 26-38-101.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Long-Term Care Insurance Act.”

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 212, § 2.

§ 26-38-102.
Applicability.

The requirements of this article shall apply to policies delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after the effective date of this article. This article is not intended to supersede the obligations of entities subject to this article to comply with the substance of other applicable insurance laws insofar as they do not conflict with this article, except that laws and regulations designed and intended to apply to medicare supplement insurance policies shall not be applied to long-term care insurance. A policy which is not advertised, marketed or offered as long-term care insurance or nursing home insurance need not meet the requirements of this article.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 212, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 3, makes the act effective on June 9, 1988.

§ 26-38-103.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Applicant” means:

In the case of an individual long-term care insurance policy, the person who seeks to contract for benefits;

In the case of a group long-term care insurance policy, the proposed certificate holder.

“Certificate” means any certificate issued under a group long-term care insurance policy, which policy has been delivered or issued for delivery in this state;

“Commissioner” means the insurance commissioner of this state;

“Group long-term care insurance” means a long-term care insurance policy which is delivered or issued for delivery in this state and issued to:

One (1) or more employers or labor organizations, or to a trust or to the trustees of a fund established by one (1) or more employers or labor organizations, or a combination thereof, for employees or former employees or a combination thereof or for members or former members or a combination thereof, of the labor organizations;

Any professional, trade or occupational association for its members or former or retired members, or combination thereof, if the association:

Is composed of individuals all of whom are or were actively engaged in the same profession, trade or occupation; and

Has been maintained in good faith for purposes other than obtaining insurance; or

An association or a trust or the trustee of a fund established, created or maintained for the benefit of members of one (1) or more associations. Prior to advertising, marketing or offering the policy within this state, the association or associations, or the insurer of the association or associations, shall file evidence with the commissioner that the association or associations has met the organizational requirements of this subparagraph. Thirty (30) days after filing, the association or associations will be deemed to satisfy the organizational requirements unless the commissioner makes a finding that the association or associations do not satisfy those organizational requirements. The evidence filed shall establish that the association or associations has at the outset a minimum of one hundred (100) persons and has been organized and maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance, has been in active existence for at least one (1) year and has a constitution and bylaws which provide that:

The association or associations hold regular meetings not less than annually to further purposes of the members;

Except for credit unions, the association or associations collect dues or solicit contributions from members; and

The members have voting privileges and representation on the governing board and committees.

A group other than as described in subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this paragraph, subject to a finding by the commissioner that:

The issuance of the group policy is in the best interest of the public;

The issuance of the group policy will result in economies of acquisition or administration; and

The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums charged.

“Long-term care insurance” means any insurance policy or rider advertised, marketed, offered or designed to provide coverage for not less than twelve (12) consecutive months for each covered person on an expense incurred, indemnity, prepaid or other basis, for one (1) or more necessary or medically necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, rehabilitative, maintenance or personal care services, provided in a setting other than an acute care unit of a hospital. The term includes group and individual annuities and life insurance policies or riders which provide directly or which supplement long-term care insurance. The term also includes a policy or rider which provides for payment of benefits based upon cognitive impairment or the loss of functional capacity. The term shall also include qualified long-term care contracts. Long-term care insurance may be issued by insurers, fraternal benefit societies, nonprofit health, hospital and medical service corporations, prepaid health plans, health maintenance organizations or any similar organization to the extent the entity is otherwise authorized to issue life or health insurance. Long-term care insurance shall not include any insurance policy which is offered primarily to provide basic Medicare supplement coverage, basic hospital expense coverage, basic medical-surgical expense coverage, hospital confinement indemnity coverage, major medical expense coverage, disability income or related asset protection coverage, accident only coverage, specified disease or specified accident coverage or limited benefit health coverage. With regard to life insurance, the term “long-term care insurance” does not include life insurance policies which accelerate the death benefit specifically for one (1) or more of the qualifying events of terminal illness, medical conditions requiring extraordinary medical intervention, or permanent institutional confinement, and which provide the option of a lump-sum payment for those benefits and in which neither the benefits nor the eligibility for the benefits is conditioned upon the receipt of long-term care. Notwithstanding any other provision contained in this article, other than W.S. 26-38-109(e), any product advertised, marketed or offered as long-term care insurance shall be subject to the provisions of this article;

“Policy” means any policy, contract, subscriber agreement, certificate, rider or endorsement delivered or issued for delivery in this state by an insurer, fraternal benefit society, nonprofit health, hospital or medical service corporation, prepaid health plan, health maintenance organization or any similar organization;

“Preexisting condition” means a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care or treatment was recommended by, or received from a provider of health care services, within six (6) months preceding the effective date of coverage of an insured person;

“Qualified long-term care insurance contract” means any life insurance contract which provides long-term care coverage by rider or as part of the contract so long as it is in compliance with the applicable provisions of section 7702B of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The term also means any other individual or group insurance contract if it meets the requirements of section 7702(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and if:

The only insurance protection provided under the contract is coverage of qualified long-term care services;

The contract does not pay or reimburse expenses incurred for services or items to the extent that such expenses are reimbursable under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, as amended, or would be so reimbursable but for the application of a deductible or coinsurance amount. The requirements of this subparagraph do not apply to contracts in which Medicare is a secondary payor, or if the contract makes per diem or other periodic payments without regard to expenses;

The contract is guaranteed renewable;

The contract does not provide for a cash surrender value or other money that can be paid, assigned, pledged as collateral for a loan or borrowed. All refunds of premiums, and all policyholder dividends or similar amounts, under such contract are to be applied as a reduction in future premiums or to increase future benefits, except that a refund of the aggregate premium paid under the contract may be allowed in the event of death of the insured or a complete surrender or cancellation of the contract; and

The contract contains the consumer protection provisions set forth in section 7702B(g) of the Internal Revenue Code.

“Qualified long-term care services” means necessary diagnostic, preventive, therapeutic, curing, treating, mitigating, and rehabilitative services, and maintenance for personal care services to which an insured is eligible for under a qualified long-term care insurance contract, and which are provided pursuant to a plan of care prescribed by a licensed health care practitioner.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 1; 1991, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 212, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section 7702B of the Internal Revenue Code is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 7702B.

§ 26-38-104.
Limits of group long-term care insurance.

No group long-term care insurance coverage may be offered to a resident of this state under a group policy issued in another state to a group described in W.S. 26-38-103(a)(iv)(D), unless this state or another state having statutory and regulatory long-term care insurance requirements substantially similar to those adopted in this state has made a determination that those requirements have been met.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-38-105.
Disclosure and performance standards for long-term care insurance.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations that include standards for full and fair disclosure setting forth the manner, content and required disclosures for the sale of long-term care insurance policies, terms of renewability, initial and subsequent conditions of eligibility, nonduplication of coverage provisions, coverage of dependents, preexisting conditions, termination of insurance, probationary periods, limitations, exceptions, reductions, elimination periods, requirements for replacement, recurrent conditions and definitions of terms.

No long-term care insurance policy shall:

Be cancelled, nonrenewed or otherwise terminated on the grounds of the age or the deterioration of the mental or physical health of the insured individual or certificate holder;

Contain a provision establishing a new waiting period in the event existing coverage is converted to or replaced by a new or other form within the same company, except with respect to an increase in benefits voluntarily selected by the insured individual or group policyholder; or

Contain coverage for skilled nursing care only or contain coverage that provides significantly more skilled care in a facility than coverage for lower levels of care.

No long-term care insurance policy or certificate shall use a definition of “preexisting condition” which is more restrictive than the definition provided in this article.

No long-term care insurance policy shall exclude coverage for a loss or confinement which is the result of a preexisting condition unless the loss or confinement begins within six (6) months following the effective date of coverage of an insured person.

The commissioner may extend the limitation periods set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of this section as to specific age group categories in specific policy forms upon finding that the extension is in the best interest of the public.

The definition of “preexisting condition” does not prohibit an insurer from using an application form designed to elicit the complete health history of an applicant, and, on the basis of the answers on that application, from underwriting in accordance with that insurer’s established underwriting standards. Unless otherwise provided in the policy, a preexisting condition, regardless of whether it is disclosed in the application, need not be covered until the waiting period described in subsection (d) of this section expires. No long-term care insurance policy may exclude or use waivers or riders of any kind to exclude, limit, or reduce coverage or benefits for specifically named or described preexisting diseases or physical conditions beyond the waiting period described in subsection (d) of this section.

No long-term care insurance policy may be delivered or issued for delivery in this state if the policy:

Conditions eligibility for any benefits on a prior hospitalization requirement;

Conditions eligibility for benefits provided in an institutional care setting on the receipt of a higher level of institutional care;

Conditions eligibility for any benefits, other than waiver of premium, post-confinement, post-acute care or recuperative benefits, on a prior institutionalization requirement; or

Fails to meet any of the following requirements:

A long-term care insurance policy containing post-confinement, post-acute care or recuperative benefits shall clearly label in a separate paragraph of the policy or certificate entitled “limitations or conditions on eligibility for benefits” the limitations or conditions, including any required number of days of confinement;

A long-term care insurance policy or rider which conditions eligibility of noninstitutional benefits on the prior receipt of institutional care shall not require a prior institutional stay of more than five (5) days;

No long-term care insurance policy or rider which provides benefits only following institutionalization shall condition the benefits upon admission to a facility for the same or related conditions within a period of less than thirty (30) days after discharge from the institution.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing loss ratio standards for long-term care insurance policies provided that a specific reference to long-term care insurance policies is contained in the regulation.

Long-term care insurance policyholders or certificate holders, shall have the right to return the policy or certificate within thirty (30) days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, the policyholder or certificate holder is not satisfied for any reason. Long-term care insurance policies and certificates shall have a notice prominently printed on the first page of the policy and certificate or attached thereto stating in substance that the policyholder or certificate holder shall have the right to return the policy within thirty (30) days of its delivery and to have the premium refunded if, after examination of the policy or certificate, other than a certificate issued pursuant to a policy issued to a group defined in W.S. 26-38-103(a)(iv)(A), the policyholder or certificate holder is not satisfied for any reason. The premium shall be refunded within ten (10) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, from the date the policy or certificate is returned. If the premium required to be refunded under this subsection is not refunded within the time periods specified it shall draw interest at the maximum rate allowed for a credit service charge under W.S. 40-14-212(b). No company issuing a long-term care insurance policy shall be required to pay any claim under the terms of the policy until the expiration of the thirty (30) day period. If an application for a qualified long-term care contract is denied, the issuer shall refund to the applicant any premium refund within thirty (30) days of the denial.

An outline of coverage shall be delivered to a prospective applicant at the time of the initial solicitation through means which prominently direct the attention of the recipient to the document and its purpose. The commissioner shall prescribe a standard format of the outline of coverage, including style, arrangement, overall appearance and content. In the case of agent solicitations, an agent shall deliver the outline of coverage prior to the presentation of an application or enrollment form. In the case of direct response solicitations, the outline of coverage shall be presented in conjunction with any application or enrollment form. In the case of a group policy, the outline shall be delivered to certificate holders when the certificate is delivered. The outline of coverage shall include:

A description of the principal benefits and coverage provided in the policy;

A statement of the principal exclusions, reductions and limitations contained in the policy;

A statement of the terms under which the policy or certificate, or both, may be continued in force or discontinued, including any reservation in the policy of a right to change premium. Continuation or conversion provisions of group coverage shall be specifically described;

A statement that the outline of coverage is a summary only, not a contract of insurance, and that the policy or group master policy contains governing contractual provisions;

A description of the terms under which the policy or certificate may be returned and premium refunded;

A brief description of the relationship of cost of care and benefits; and

If the policy or certificate is intended to be a qualified long-term care insurance contract, a statement that discloses to the policyholder or certificate holder that the policy is intended to be a qualified long-term care insurance contract.

and (n) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 212, § 3.

The issuer of a long-term care insurance contract shall deliver to the applicant, policyholder or certificate holder, the contract or certificate of insurance no later than thirty (30) days after the date of approval. At the time of policy delivery, a policy summary shall be delivered for an individual life insurance policy which provides long-term care benefits within the policy or rider. In the case of direct response solicitations, the insurer shall deliver the policy summary upon the applicant’s request, but regardless of request shall make the delivery no later than at the time of policy delivery. In addition to complying with all applicable requirements, the summary shall also include:

An explanation of how the long-term care benefit interacts with other components of the policy, including deductions from death benefits;

An illustration of the amount of benefits, the length of benefits, and guaranteed lifetime benefits if any, for each covered person;

Any exclusions, reductions and limitations on benefits of long-term care; and

If applicable to the policy type, the summary shall also include:

A disclosure of the effects of exercising other rights under the policy;

A disclosure of guarantees related to long-term care costs of insurance charges; and

Current and projected maximum lifetime benefits.

If any long-term care benefit, funded through a life insurance vehicle by the acceleration of the death benefit, is in benefit payment status, a monthly report shall be provided to the policyholder. The report shall include:

Any long-term care benefits paid out during the month;

An explanation of any changes in the policy, including, but not limited to, death benefits or cash values, due to long-term care benefits; and

The amount of long-term care benefits existing or remaining.

If a claim under a long-term care insurance contract is denied, the issuer shall, within sixty (60) days of the date of a written request by the policyholder, or certificate holder or an authorized representative:

Provide a written explanation of the reason for the denial; and

Make available all information directly related to the denial.

Long-term care insurance premium rate increases shall be based on accepted actuarial principles and practices. All long-term care insurance premium rate increases shall be subject to the approval of the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 1; 1991, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 212, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 2020 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (r).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Waiver or estoppel of insurer on basis of statements or omissions in promotional, illustrative, or explanatory materials given to insured, 63 ALR5th 427.

§ 26-38-106.
Rulemaking authority.

The commissioner shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this article in accordance with W.S.

26-2-110

.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 9, § 1; 1993, ch. 212, § 2.

§ 26-38-107.
Incontestability period.

For a long-term care insurance policy or certificate that has been in force for less than six (6) months, an insurer may rescind the policy or certificate or deny any otherwise valid long-term care insurance claim upon a showing of misrepresentation that is material to the acceptance of coverage.

For a long-term care insurance policy or certificate that has been in force for at least six (6) months but less than two (2) years, an insurer may rescind the policy or certificate or deny an otherwise valid long-term care insurance claim upon a showing of misrepresentation that is both material to the acceptance for coverage and which pertains to the conditions for which benefits are sought.

After a long-term care insurance policy or certificate has been in force for two (2) years it is not contestable upon the grounds of misrepresentation, unless the insured knowingly and intentionally misrepresented relevant facts relating to the insured’s health.

No long-term care insurance policy or certificate may be field issued based on medical or health status. For purposes of this section, “field issued” means a policy or certificate issued by an agent or a third party administrator pursuant to the underwriting authority granted to the agent or third party administrator by an insurer.

If an insurer has paid benefits under the long-term care insurance policy or certificate, the benefit payments may not be recovered by the insurer in the event that the policy or certificate is rescinded.

An insurer shall rescind a long-term care policy or certificate for misrepresentation only as provided in this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 212, § 1.

§ 26-38-108.
Third party notice and reinstatement.

Each insurer offering long-term care insurance shall, as a protection against unintentional lapse, comply with the following:

No individual long-term care policy or certificate shall be issued until the insurer has received from the applicant either a written designation of at least one (1) person, in addition to the applicant, who is to receive notice of lapse or termination of the policy or certificate for nonpayment of premium, or a written waiver dated and signed by the applicant electing not to designate additional persons to receive notice. The applicant has the right to designate at least one (1) person who is to receive the notice of termination, in addition to the insured. A designation shall not constitute acceptance of any liability by the third party for services provided to the insured. The form used for the written designation shall provide space clearly designated for listing at least one (1) person. The designation shall include each person’s full name and home address. In the case of an applicant who elects not to designate an additional person, the waiver shall state: “Protection against unintended lapse.” “I understand that I have the right to designate at least one (1) person other than myself to receive notice of lapse or termination of this long-term care insurance policy for nonpayment of premium. I understand that notice will not be given until thirty (30) days after a premium is due and unpaid. I elect not to designate any person to receive such notice.” The insurer shall notify the insured of the right to change the written designation, no less than once every two (2) years;

When the policyholder or certificate holder pays premium for a long-term care insurance policy or certificate through a payroll or pension deduction plan, the requirements contained in paragraph (a)(i) of this section need not be met until sixty (60) days after the policyholder or certificate holder is no longer enrolled in the payment plan. The application or enrollment form for such policies or certificates shall clearly indicate the payment plan selected by the applicant;

No long-term care policy or certificate shall lapse or be terminated for nonpayment of premium unless the insurer, at least thirty (30) days before the effective date of the lapse or termination, has given notice to the insured and to those persons designated pursuant to paragraph (a)(i) of this section, at the address provided by the insured, to receive notice of lapse or termination. Notice shall be given by first class United States mail, postage prepaid. Notice shall not be given until thirty (30) days after a premium is due and unpaid. Notice shall be deemed to have been given as of five (5) days after the date of mailing.

In addition to the requirements in subsection (a) of this section, a long-term care insurance policy or certificate shall include a provision which provides for reinstatement of coverage, in the event of lapse if the insurer is provided proof of cognitive impairment or the loss of functional capacity. This option shall be available to the insured if requested within five (5) months after termination and shall allow for the collection of past due premium, where appropriate. The standard of proof of cognitive impairment or loss of functional capacity shall not be more stringent than the benefit eligibility criteria on cognitive impairment or the loss of functional capacity, if any, contained in the policy or certificate.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 212, § 1.

§ 26-38-109.
Nonforfeiture benefit provisions.

Subject to subsection (g) of this section, an insurer that offers a long-term care insurance policy or certificate in this state shall offer a nonforfeiture protection provision as an option. The nonforfeiture benefit shall be made available in the event of a default in the payment of any premiums, or upon the surrender of the policy or certificate by the policyholder or certificate holder.

Subject to subsection (g) of this section, the nonforfeiture provision offered for a policy which is not intended to be a qualified long-term insurance contract, shall be appropriately captioned and shall provide at least one (1) of the following:

Reduced paid-up insurance;

Extended term insurance;

Cash surrender values;

A return of premium;

A shortened benefit period; or

Other offerings as approved by the commissioner.

Nonforfeiture benefits shall be computed in an actuarially sound manner, using a methodology that has been filed with and approved by the commissioner. At the time of lapse, or upon request by the policyholder or certificate holder, the insurer shall disclose the then-accrued nonforfeiture values. At the time the policy or certificate is issued, the insurer shall provide to the policyholder or certificate holder schedules demonstrating estimated values of nonforfeiture benefits. The schedules shall state that the estimated values are not to be construed as guaranteed nonforfeiture values.

The amount of nonforfeiture benefits shall be adjusted subsequent to being initially granted only as necessary to reflect changes in claims, persistency and interest as reflected in changes in rates for premium paying policies approved by the commissioner for the same policy form.

This section does not apply to life insurance policies or riders containing accelerated long-term care benefits.

Nonforfeiture benefits for qualified long-term care insurance contracts shall include at least a reduced paid-up insurance benefit, an extended term insurance benefit, the offer of a shortened benefit period, or other similar offerings approved by the secretary of the treasury, and shall be provided as specified in regulations. The issuer of such a contract may refund premiums upon complete surrender or cancellation of the contract or policy, as long as the refund does not exceed the aggregate premiums paid for the contract or policy.

Within fifteen (15) business days following receipt of written proof of the death of an insured, an insurer under this chapter shall refund unearned premiums paid for any period beyond the death of the insured. The amount of the refund shall be pro rata from the date of death.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 212, § 1; 1997, ch. 120, § 1; 1999, ch. 177, § 1.

§ 26-38-110.
Compliance with article required.

No policy shall be advertised, marketed or offered as long-term care or nursing home insurance unless it complies with the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 212, § 1.

§ 26-38-111.
Penalties.

In addition to any other penalties provided by the laws of this state, any insurer or agent who violates any requirement of this state relating to the regulation of long-term care insurance or the marketing of such insurance shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed three (3) times the amount of any commissions paid for each policy involved in the violation or ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), whichever is greater. The penalty shall be assessed by the commissioner in accordance with W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 212, § 1.